Nebraska, session 109, LB771.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 75-327, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-327 (1) A participating driver shall not provide a ride unless it is a
prearranged ride. No person shall be a participating driver for a period of
more than twelve hours during each twenty-four-hour period.
(2)(a) A transportation network company may offer service for
compensation, no charge, or suggested compensation.
(b) Except as provided in this section, transportation network companies
shall not be subject to rate regulation by the commission and shall not be
subject to provisions relating to rates and charges prescribed in sections
75-101 to 75-158.
(c) A transportation network company shall file with the commission the
rates it uses to determine any compensation or suggested compensation on its
online-enabled application or platform, including any use of dynamic pricing.
The transportation network company shall keep the rate filing current and shall
charge rates consistent with the rates it files with the commission.
(d) The following requirements apply if the transportation network company
uses dynamic pricing through its online-enabled application or platform:
(i) The transportation network company's online-enabled application or
platform shall provide clear visible indication that dynamic pricing is in
effect prior to the passenger requesting a ride;
(ii) The transportation network company's online-enabled application or
platform shall include a feature that requires the passenger to expressly
confirm that he or she understands that dynamic pricing will be used in order
for the ride request to be completed;
(iii) The transportation network company's online-enabled application or
platform shall provide a fare estimator that enables the passenger to estimate
the cost under dynamic pricing prior to requesting the ride; and
(iv) Dynamic pricing shall not be permitted for seven days after any state
of emergency declared by the Governor when such emergency impacts the
transportation of persons, suppliers, goods, or equipment. The prohibition
shall be confined to the areas delineated in the Governor's emergency
proclamation. The Governor may further regulate dynamic pricing at his or her
discretion during any state of emergency through executive order. Dynamic
pricing shall not be permitted during any state of emergency declared by the
Governor.
(3) Upon completion of a prearranged ride, a transportation network
company shall transmit an electronic receipt to the passenger's email address
or online-enabled application documenting the following:
(a) The point of origin and destination of the prearranged ride;
(b) The total duration and distance of the prearranged ride;
(c) The total amount paid, if any, including the base fare and any
additional charges incurred for distance traveled or duration of the
prearranged ride; and
(d) The driver's first name.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-327, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-